Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 3 Division of Arkansas Heritage
25-4-105. Division of Information Systems — General powers and duties.

(1)The Division of Information Systems shall be vested with all the powers and duties necessary to administer the division and to enable it to carry out fully and effectively the rules and laws relating to the division.

The division's powers and duties relate to information technology and include without limitation:

Conceptualizing, designing, developing, building, and maintaining common information technology infrastructure elements used by state agencies and governmental entities;

Providing information technology services to state agencies, other governmental entities, nongovernmental first responder entities, and other quasi-governmental entities;

Entering into contracts with state agencies, other governmental entities, and nongovernmental first responder entities for the purpose of providing information technology services;

(i)Establishing fair and reasonable schedules of rates or fees to be paid by customers that are provided service to enable the division to recover all allowable costs of providing the services as provided in this chapter.

The same rate or fee structure will apply to all customers receiving services;

(i)Establishing estimated billing rates to be developed for a period to coincide with the budgeting process.

The division shall have the authority to adjust billing as necessary to effect compliance with applicable state and federal statutory and regulatory provisions.

Billing adjustments shall be subject to the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and review by the Legislative Council;

Acquiring information technology on behalf of state agencies, the cost of which shall be recovered through customer billings or through direct funding;

Promulgating rules that are necessary for efficient administration and enforcement of the powers, functions, and duties of the division as provided in this chapter;

Developing a division plan to support the goals and objectives set forth for it in the state information technology plans and strategies;

Implementing systems to ensure the security of state data and state data processing assets, to provide for disaster recovery and continuity of operations to the state agencies served, and to recover its costs from the customers benefited;

Performing any additional powers, functions, and duties that are necessary and appropriate for the proper administration of the provisions of this chapter;

Providing a State Cyber Security Office to monitor information resource security issues, coordinating all security measures that could be used to protect resources by more than one (1) governmental entity, and acting as an information technology resource to other state agencies;

Assisting in the development of an information technology security policy for state agencies;

Developing the information technology security policy for state agencies;

Advising agencies in acquiring information technology service;

Developing the information technology policies, standards, and specifications for state agencies and ensuring agencies' compliance with those policies, procedures, and standards;

Participating in the development of information technology state contracts, including without limitation the identification of requirements, contract negotiation, and vendor evaluation;

With respect to their technology functions and applications, all state departments, boards, commissions, and public institutions of higher education, consulting and cooperating with the division in the formation and implementation of security policies for the state core information technology infrastructure;

Developing a state information technology plan that shall establish a state-level mission, goals, and objectives for the use of information technology;

Identifying and establishing information technology solutions that can support more than one (1) agency in providing governmental services;

Advising agencies regarding information technology contracts and agreements;

Developing policies to promote and facilitate electronic access to government information and interoperability of information systems; and

Reviewing and approving agencies' information technology plans and requests.

This chapter shall not be construed to deprive, transfer, limit, or in any way alter or change any of the powers vested in the board of trustees of any institution of higher education under existing constitutional and statutory provisions.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 884, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1405; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 5; 2001, No. 1722, § 4; 2005, No. 1999, § 3; 2007, No. 751, § 13; 2009, No. 648, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 2911; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6263-6267.

25-4-106. Reporting requirements.

(1)The Director of the Division of Information Systems will report periodically to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology regarding the status of the Division of Information Systems' information technology responsibilities in state government.

The director may report any factors that are outside the scope of the division but are deemed to inhibit or to promote the division's responsibilities.

(1)By October 31, January 31, April 30, and July 31 of each fiscal year, the director shall compile and submit a report to the:

Legislative Council, if submitted between regular sessions of the General Assembly;

Joint Budget Committee, if submitted during a session of the General Assembly; and

Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

The report shall:

Detail all requests from state agencies, boards, and commissions for advice regarding information technology planning, implementation, installation, rates or fees, utilization of products, services, and integrations or upgrades to be added to all existing technology plans; and

Provide a full report of all corresponding recommendations made by the division to the requesting state agencies, boards, and commissions.

The report shall include:

The name of the state agency, board, or commission requesting the advice;

The name and scope of the project for which advice is being sought;

The type of advice sought, for example, technical, product or service utilization, planning, implementation, installation, integration, or upgrades;

A detailed explanation of all recommendations provided by the department;

How the recommendation fits into the information technology plan of the agency, board, or commission;

How the recommendation fits into the state's information technology plan and state enterprise architecture; and

Other information as may be useful for policy making decisions by the Legislative Council or the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 884, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1406; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 6; 2001, No. 1722, § 5; 2003, No. 1627, § 12; 2007, No. 751, § 14; 2009, No. 648, § 4; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6268, 6269.

25-4-107. [Repealed.]

The Director of the Division of Information Systems may appoint working groups as necessary for specific purposes related to information technology coordination.

Working group membership shall be determined by the director.

Each working group shall establish a timeline for completion of its charge to accomplish performance-driven results.

Working groups shall meet at least quarterly to achieve their assigned charges.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 884, § 8; 1979, No. 820, § 2; 1985, No. 463, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1408; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 8; 2005, No. 1999, § 4; 2007, No. 751, § 16; 2019, No. 910, § 6270.

25-4-109. Information technology centers.

The Division of Information Systems is authorized to establish, maintain, and operate information technology centers and, in connection therewith, to rent, purchase, install, operate, and maintain information technology for state agencies as authorized in this chapter.

The division is authorized to enter into contracts or agreements with state agencies for the purpose of providing information technology.

State agencies are authorized to enter into any contracts with the division or its successor that may be necessary or desirable to effectuate the purposes and policies of this chapter or for maximum utilization of facilities and services that are the subject of this chapter.

Agencies shall use the core information technology infrastructure.

The division is authorized to enter into agreements and contracts with public utilities for telecommunications service.

The information technology centers operated by the division shall be made available to all state agencies that fall within economical and feasible boundaries.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 884, § 8; 1979, No. 820, § 2; 1985, No. 463, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1408; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 9; 2001, No. 1722, § 6; 2005, No. 1999, § 5; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6271, 6272.

25-4-110. Information technology — Planning.

The Division of Information Systems shall submit status reports annually or when requested to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

(1)Each state agency shall develop a biennial information technology plan that establishes state agency goals, objectives, and policies regarding the development and use of information technology.

(A)Each state agency shall specifically include a policy regarding the use of the internet.

A statement of the agency's policy regarding the use of the internet shall include:

The penalties for violations of the agency's internet policy;

The number of employees and computers that have access to the internet and the percentage of those employees and computers to the total number of employees and computers;

The needs of the agency and how those needs relate to the use of the internet; and

The responsibilities of the agency's employees as those responsibilities relate to the efficient and responsible use of the internet.

Plans may be updated by agencies in a timely manner to remain current and must accommodate changes in the evolving state information technology plan and standards.

The division shall distribute criteria, elements, form, and format for agency plans. Plans may include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1)Plans developed or updated shall be submitted to the division.

The division may reject, require modification to, or approve plans as deemed appropriate.

Plans shall be modified by the state agency as necessary.

(1)Plans developed or updated by public instrumentalities shall be submitted for review to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology.

The Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology may seek the assistance of the division in conducting this review.

Plans shall be modified by the public instrumentality as necessary.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 884, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1409; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 10; 2001, No. 1287, § 1; 2001, No. 1722, § 7; 2007, No. 751, § 17; 2009, No. 648, § 6; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6273-6275.

25-4-111. Information technology — Prerequisites.

Unless the agency first receives approval for a plan or an updated plan as provided for under §25-4-110, a state agency shall not:

Acquire by purchase or lease any new or additional information technology; or

Enter into any contract for information technology.

If an agency desires to acquire information technology not part of an information technology plan approved under §25-4-110, the requesting agency shall submit a waiver request to the Director of the Division of Information Systems that includes:

Identification of necessary additional services or improvements in information technology;

Relationship of the information technology improvements or additions to the overall goals of the agency;

Resources needed to provide the additional services or improvements; and

Measurement and evaluation criteria.

(1)Upon evaluation of the waiver request, the director shall notify the agency in writing of his or her approval or rejection of the request and his or her reasons.

The director shall make his or her evaluation in a timely manner. If the director requires more than thirty (30) days to complete the evaluation, he or she shall report in writing to the Governor and the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services his or her reasons for the delay in completion.

If the director rejects a request for a waiver, a state agency shall not make any expenditure of public funds for the acquisition or expansion of information technology equipment or services.

If the director determines that the agency needs additional information technology resources, he or she may:

History.

Acts 1977, No. 884, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1410; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 11; 2001, No. 1722, § 8; 2007, No. 751, § 18; 2009, No. 648, § 7; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6276, 6277.

25-4-112. Application to educational institutions.

On-campus telecommunications systems shall also be exempt from the provisions of this chapter except when they are connected to the state telecommunications network infrastructure.

On-campus telecommunications systems shall be defined as those bounded by the outer perimeter of contiguous campus property.

(A)Assistance shall be provided by the division free of charge within a reasonable period.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 884, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1416; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 12; 2005, No. 1999, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 6278.

25-4-113. [Repealed.]

History.

Acts 1977, No. 884, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1415; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 14; 2001, No. 1722, § 10; 2007, No. 751, § 19; 2009, No. 648, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 6279.

25-4-115. Professional services contracts between division and outside vendors.

The division may also consolidate information technology needs to satisfy agency requests.

(A)Provided, however, that before approving the use of moneys appropriated for payment of regular salaries of the division for obtaining professional services, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall determine that resignations, vacancies in positions, or the inability to employ persons with technical skills to provide the services has necessitated that action.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 884, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1411; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 15; 2001, No. 1722, § 11; 2019, No. 910, § 6280.

25-4-116. Payment for information technology.

Provided, however, before approving any transfers of moneys appropriated for a state agency to the line-item appropriation for purchase of information technology of that state agency, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall obtain the advice of the Legislative Council with respect thereto.

The transfers authorized in this chapter shall be made from time to time within the amounts authorized in the procedures set forth in this chapter, upon payment for information technology purchased from the division.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 884, § 12; 1979, No. 796, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1412; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 16;
2019, No. 910, §§ 6281, 6282.

25-4-117. Delinquent accounts.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 884, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1407; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 17; 2001, No. 1722, § 12;
2019, No. 910, § 6283.

25-4-118. [Repealed.]

The director shall also provide cost information to users of information technology centers, and those who require new or expanded information technology shall be provided cost estimates for inclusion in their budget requests.

The proposed annual operating budget shall be submitted to the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services for his or her approval prior to the beginning of each fiscal year.

(A)During the course of the biennium, the director shall make certain that the expenditures of the division do not exceed the income to be received by the division for the current fiscal year.

(A)If rates charged to a customer are increased to ensure compliance with state and federal statutory and regulatory provisions under subdivision (b)(3) of this section, then the director shall promptly notify the Governor, the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology, and all state agencies and other customers before any changes shall be effected.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 951, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1413.1; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 19; 2001, No. 1722, § 14; 2005, No. 1999, § 7; 2019, No. 910, § 6284.

25-4-120. Revisions to budget, purchasing, and personnel process.

The Legislative Council shall prepare recommendations for changes in the information technology budget process for utilization in the development of state agency budgets for the next biennial budget cycle.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 884, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1413; Acts 1997, No. 914, § 20; 2019, No. 910, § 6285.

25-4-121. Division of Information Systems Revolving Fund.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 914, § 21; 2001, No. 1722, § 15; 2005, No. 1999, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 6286.

25-4-122. Reserve for equipment acquisition — Loans.

(A)In addition, the division is authorized to obtain from the State Board of Finance loans from the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund to supplement the reserve if the reserve is insufficient to handle the total cost of required equipment acquisitions.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 914, § 21; 2005, No. 1999, § 9; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6287-6289.

25-4-123. Information Technology Reserve Fund.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 914, § 21; 2019, No. 910, § 6290.

25-4-124. Yearly computation of expenses — Disposition of surplus funds.

In the event that a customer no longer uses the services of the division, a fund transfer in the amount of that customer's credits under the plan described in subsection (a) of this section shall be made from the Division of Information Systems Revolving Fund to the customer's treasury fund, upon certification of the amount by the director to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the Treasurer of State. In the event the customer does not have a treasury fund, a warrant shall be issued by the division in payment of the customer's credit.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 914, § 21; 2005, No. 1999, § 10; 2019, No. 910, § 6291.

25-4-125. State Broadband Manager.

Serving as a single point of contact for:

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1168, § 1; 2017, No. 707, §
289; 2019, No. 792, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2380, 6292, 6293.

25-4-126. Chief Data Officer and Chief Privacy Officer.

The Chief Data Officer of the Division of Information Systems and the Chief Privacy Officer of the Division of Information Systems shall not be the same person.

(A)Provide master data management by facilitating standardization, deduplication, sharing, and integration of critical data between systems and state agencies.

Oversee, develop, and implement methods to ensure that all state agencies comply with federal and state laws governing the privacy of and access to protected data;

Assure that the use of technology sustains, and does not erode, privacy protections relating to the use, collection, and disclosure of personal information;

Assure that personal information contained in privacy act systems of records complies with the Privacy Act of 1974, 5 U.S.C. § 552(a);

Review regulatory proposals and procedures involving the collection, use, and disclosure of personal information by the federal government, state government, and local government; and

(A)Prepare and submit an annual report to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology concerning activities that affect privacy.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 912, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6294-6296.

25-4-127. Data and Transparency Panel — Creation — Duties.

(A)Three (3) appointees from the private sector who shall be appointed as follows:

Perform a feasibility and cost study on the development of a statewide data warehouse program;

Evaluate and identify data to be included in the statewide data warehouse program;

Determine and recommend procedures necessary for the implementation of a statewide data warehouse program;

Oversee a statewide data warehouse program implemented in this state;

Evaluate and identify data that may be provided to the public in accordance with data standards and specifications developed by the Division of Information Systems;

Provide annual reports to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology; and

Develop a unified longitudinal system that links existing siloed agency information for education and workforce outcomes to continuously conduct a business systems assessment to:

Special meetings may be called at the discretion of the chair.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 912, § 1; 2019, No. 147, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6297-6299; 2019, No. 936, §§ 1, 2.

25-4-128. Data and Transparency Panel — Records — Confidentiality.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 912, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6300.

25-3-104. Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage Advisory Committee.

25-3-108. Heritage foundation.